District of Columbia statutes.
43-118

Superintendent of cemetery to register at Department of Health.

It shall be the duty of the superintendent or person in charge of any cemetery or other place for the disposal of dead bodies of human beings in the District of Columbia to register his or her name at the office of the Department of Health of said District, giving full name, residence, and place of business, and in case of removal from one place to another in said District to make change in such register accordingly.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1296, ch. 854, § 674
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191,§§ 8(b), 65(b), 53 DCR 6794

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 27-118.
1973 Ed., § 27-117.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-191 substituted “Health” for “Human Services”.